Massachusetts, session 194th, H2527.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6A of the General Laws shall be amended by adding after section 16FF the
following new section:-
Section 16GG. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
executive office of health and human services shall establish an endometriosis task force. The
task force shall consist of: the secretary of the executive office of health and human services or a
designee, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of the department of public health or a
designee; the commissioner of the division of insurance or a designee; the director of Medicaid
or a designee; and 7 persons to be appointed by the secretary of the executive office of health and
human services, 2 of whom shall be representatives from the Massachusetts Medical Society
Alliance, Inc. appointed in consultation with their relevant specialty chapters, 1 of whom shall be
a representative from the Massachusetts Association of Health Plans, Inc., 1 of whom shall be a
representative from commercial health insurance plans or managed care organizations doing
of 2

business in the commonwealth, 1 of whom shall be an individual with a diagnosis of
endometriosis, 1 of whom shall be a representative of a pharmaceutical company that
manufactures a drug or device for detecting, preventing or treating endometriosis and 1 of whom
shall be a representative of a research, advocacy or support organization primarily serving
individuals with a diagnosis of endometriosis.
(b) The task force shall: (i) develop and annually update a summary of the advances
made in research on and treatment and diagnosis of endometriosis; (ii) develop and annually
update a summary of the advances made in access to care for individuals with a diagnosis of
endometriosis; (iii) monitor endometriosis research, services and support activities across the
commonwealth, including coordination of the commonwealth's activities and programs with
respect to endometriosis; (iv) develop and annually update a comprehensive strategic plan to
improve health outcomes for individuals with a diagnosis of endometriosis, including
recommendations to: (1) advance research on endometriosis; (2) improve public awareness and
recognition of endometriosis; (3) improve health care delivery for individuals with a diagnosis of
endometriosis; (4) improve the early and accurate diagnosis of endometriosis; and (5)
systematically advance the full spectrum of biomedical research on endometriosis; and (v)
develop and annually update the progress made in implementing such comprehensive strategic
plan.
(c) The task force shall submit its recommendations to the governor and the clerks of the
house of representatives and senate annually not later than December 31 of each year.
of 2